California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(2) (A) The credit allowable under this section in any taxable year to any qualified taxpayer shall be limited to a maximum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(B) For qualified taxpayers that are required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101 or authorized to be
 included in a combined report under Section 25101.15, the limit specified in subparagraph (A) shall be the aggregate amount of the credit claimed by all taxpayers that are required to be or authorized to be included in a combined report and in no instance shall the aggregate amount of credit claimed by a combined group exceed the limit specified in subparagraph (A).

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Full-time employee” means an individual who is either of the following:

(A) Paid wages subject to withholding under Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code by the qualified taxpayer for services not less than an average of 35 hours per week.

(B) A salaried employee who was paid compensation during the taxable year
 for full-time employment, as described in Section 515 of the Labor Code, by the qualified taxpayer that is paid wages subject to withholding under Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(2) “Minimum wage” means the wage established pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1171) of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(3) “Qualified expenditures” means amounts paid or incurred by a qualified taxpayer for any of the following:

(A) Employment compensation for the full-time employees of the qualified taxpayer. For purposes of this subparagraph, “employment compensation” means wages paid to full-time employees who are paid no less than 150 percent but no more than 350 percent of the applicable minimum wage. The calculation of wages pursuant to this subparagraph may include
 the monetary value to the full-time employee of employer-provided group health insurance benefits, childcare benefits, employer contributions to employer-provided retirement benefits, or employer contributions to pension benefits.

(B) Safety-related equipment, training, and services. For purposes of this subparagraph, “safety-related equipment, training, and services” means equipment primarily used by employees of cannabis licensees to ensure their personal and occupational safety or the safety of customers of the cannabis licensees; training for nonmanagement employees on workplace hazards, including, but not limited to, training required pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 26051.5 of the Business and Professions Code; and services, including, but not limited to, safety audits, security guards, security cameras, and fire risk mitigation.

(C) Workforce development and safety training for employees of the qualified taxpayer. For purposes of this subparagraph, “workforce development” includes, but is not limited to, joint labor management training programs, membership in a joint apprenticeship training committee registered by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards, and a state-recognized high road training partnership as defined in Section 14005 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(4) “Qualified taxpayer” means a commercial cannabis business, licensed pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code, and that provides full-time employees with all of the following:

(A) Employment compensation, as described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3).

(B) Employer-provided group health insurance.

(C) Employer-provided retirement benefits or pension benefits, including stock in the duly licensed commercial cannabis employer to employees under employee stock ownership plans where the employer pays for the full value of the stock.

(D) Possesses a Type-10 or a Type-12 license pursuant to Section 26050 of the Business and Professions Code.

(c) The total aggregate amount of the credit that may be allocated by credit reservations to all qualified taxpayers pursuant to this section and Section 23664 shall not exceed twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) for all taxable years, cumulatively.

(d) To be eligible for the credit allowed by this section, a qualified taxpayer shall request a credit reservation from the Franchise Tax Board during the month of July
 for each taxable year or within 30 days of the start of their taxable year if the qualified taxpayer’s taxable year begins after July, in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(e) To obtain a credit reservation with respect to a qualified expenditure, the qualified taxpayer shall provide all necessary information, as determined by the Franchise Tax Board.

(f) The Franchise Tax Board shall approve tentative credit reservations with respect to qualified expenditures incurred during a taxable year for qualified taxpayers, subject to the cap established under this section and Section 23664.

(g) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following taxable year, and the seven succeeding years if necessary,
 until the credit is exhausted.

(h) If the credit allowed by this section is claimed by the qualified taxpayer, any deduction or credit otherwise allowed under this part for any qualified expenditure made by the qualified taxpayer as a trade or business expense shall be reduced by the amount of the credit allowed by this section.

(i) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe rules, guidelines, or procedures necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section, including any guidelines regarding the allocation of the credit allowed under this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(j) This section shall remain in effect
 only until December 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 14.   (AB 195)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed as of December 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17053.71.

(a) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2022, there shall be allowed a small business hiring credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, to a qualified small business employer that receives a tentative credit reservation under Section 6902.10, in an amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) The amount of the credit allowed by this subdivision shall be equal to the amount calculated pursuant to subparagraph (A) minus the amount calculated pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(A) One thousand dollars ($1,000) for each net increase in qualified employees, as specified in subdivision (c), not to exceed one
 hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).

(B) If the qualified small business employer received a tentative credit reservation amount pursuant to Section 6902.8, either of the following applies:

(i) For a qualified small business employer that made an irrevocable election pursuant to Section 6902.8 to apply the credit against qualified sales and use taxes pursuant to Section 6902.7, the credit amounts allocated to the qualified small business employer pursuant to Sections 6902.7 and 6902.8.

(ii) For a qualified small business employer that elected to apply the credit under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or both, the tentative credit reservation amount received by the qualified small business employer pursuant to Section 6902.8.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Monthly full-time equivalent” means either of the following:

(A) For a qualified employee paid hourly qualified wages, “monthly full-time equivalent” means the total number of hours employed per month for the qualified small business employer by the qualified employee, not to exceed 167 hours per month per qualified employee, divided by 167.

(B) In the case of a salaried qualified employee, “monthly full-time equivalent” means the total number of weeks employed per month for the qualified small business employer by the qualified employee divided by 4.33 multiplied by the time base the qualified employee was employed.

(2) (A) “Qualified employee” means an employee who is paid qualified wages by a qualified small business employer.

(B) “Qualified employee” shall not include an employee whose qualified wages are included in calculating any other credit allowed under this part, except for the credit allowed under Section 17053.72.

(3) (A) “Qualified small business employer” means a taxpayer that as of December 31, 2020, employed a total of 500 or fewer qualified employees and meets one of the following requirements:

(i) Has a decrease of 20 percent or more in gross receipts determined by comparing gross receipts for the period beginning on January 1, 2020, and ending on December 31, 2020, to the gross receipts for the period beginning on January 1, 2019, and ending on December 31, 2019.

(ii) Is a fiscal year filer that has a decrease of 20 percent or more in gross receipts determined by comparing either of the following:

(I) The gross receipts for fiscal year 2019–20 to the gross receipts from fiscal year 2018–19.

(II) The average of gross receipts for fiscal year 2019–20 and fiscal year 2020–21 to the gross receipts from fiscal year 2018–19.

(iii) For a taxpayer that first commences business after January 1, 2019, but on or before January 1, 2020, has a decrease of 20 percent or more in gross receipts in the second quarter of 2020 determined by comparing gross receipts from January 1, 2020, through February 28, 2020, multiplied by 1.5 to the gross receipts for the period beginning on April 1, 2020, and ending on June 30, 2020.

(B) “Qualified small business employer” does not include a taxpayer required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101 or 25110 or authorized to be included in a combined report under Section 25101.15.

(4) “Qualified wages” means wages subject to withholding under Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(5) “Time base” means the fraction of full-time employment that the qualified employee is employed.

(6) “Weeks employed” means the total number of calendar days that a qualified employee was employed by the qualified small business employer during the month, divided by seven, not to exceed 4.33.

(c) The net increase in qualified employees of
 a qualified small business employer shall be equal to the amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (2) minus the amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (1).

(1) The average monthly full-time equivalent qualified employees employed during the three-month period beginning on April 1, 2020, and ending on June 30, 2020, by the qualified small business employer. The average monthly full-time equivalent qualified employees is determined by adding the total monthly full-time equivalent qualified employees employed by the qualified small business employer for all three months and dividing the total by three.

(2) The lesser of either of the following:

(A) The average monthly full-time equivalent qualified employees employed during the 12-month period beginning on July 1, 2020, and ending on June 30, 2021, by the qualified
 small business employer. The average monthly full-time equivalent qualified employees is determined by adding the total monthly full-time equivalent qualified employees employed by the qualified small business employer for all 12 months and dividing the total by 12.

(B) The average monthly full-time equivalent qualified employees employed during the three-month period beginning on April 1, 2021, and ending on June 30, 2021, by the qualified small business employer. The average monthly full-time equivalent qualified employees is determined by adding the total monthly full-time equivalent qualified employees employed by the qualified small business employer for all three months and dividing the total by three.

(d) If the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following year, and succeeding four years if
 necessary, until the credit is exhausted.

(e) A deduction otherwise allowed under this part for qualified wages shall be reduced by the amount of the credit allowed under this section.

(f) For purposes of this section all of the following shall apply:

(1) All employees of the trades or businesses that are treated as related under Section 267, 318, or 707 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be treated as employed by a single qualified small business employer.

(2) If a qualified small business employer changes its business form to a different entity type after receiving a tentative credit reservation under Section 6902.10 and continues operation, the new entity shall be allowed the credit, and the determination of the amount of the credit under this
 section with respect to qualified wages paid or incurred by the qualified small business employer shall apply to the new entity as if those qualified wages were paid or incurred by the new entity.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 23803, an “S” corporation that makes the election under Section 6902.10 shall be allowed to apply the full credit amount against qualified sales and use tax, and no amount of credit shall be allowed to reduce the shareholder’s liability under this part.

(h) A disallowance of a credit claimed due to the application of the limitation specified in Section 6902.10 shall be treated as a mathematical error appearing on the return. An amount of tax resulting from that disallowance may be assessed by the Franchise Tax Board in the same manner as provided by Section 19051.

(i) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may adopt regulations necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board may adopt rules, guidelines, procedures, or other guidance to carry out the purposes of this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any regulation, rule, guideline, procedure, or other guidance adopted by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(j) Notwithstanding Section 19542, the Franchise Tax Board may provide to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, only to the extent allowed under federal law, information related to the credit allowed by Section 6902.9, this section, and Section 23628, including, but not limited to, the qualified small business employer names, amounts of tax credits allowed under each
 section, amount of gross receipts, and the net increase in qualified employees.

(k) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 55 of the Statutes of 2022 shall apply for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2022.

(l) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2026, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 737, Sec. 2.   (AB 158)   Effective September 29, 2022.   Repealed as of December 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17053.73.

(a) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2014, and before January 1, 2026, there shall be allowed to a qualified taxpayer that hires a qualified full-time employee and pays or incurs qualified wages attributable to work performed by the qualified full-time employee in a designated census tract or economic development area, and that receives a tentative credit reservation for that qualified full-time employee, a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, in an amount calculated under this section.

(2) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2023, and before January 1, 2026, the designated census tract or economic development area requirements shall not apply to a qualified taxpayer
 described in clause (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (14) of subdivision (b).

(3) The amount of the credit allowable under this section for a taxable year shall be equal to the product of the tentative credit amount for the taxable year and the applicable percentage for that taxable year.

(4) (A) If a qualified taxpayer relocates to a designated census tract or economic development area, the qualified taxpayer shall be allowed a credit with respect to qualified wages for each qualified full-time employee employed within the new location only if the qualified taxpayer provides each employee at the previous location or locations a written offer of employment at the new location in the designated census tract or economic development area with comparable compensation.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “relocates to a designated census tract or economic development area” means an increase in the number of qualified full-time employees, employed by a qualified taxpayer, within a designated census tract or tracts or economic development areas within a 12-month period in which there is a decrease in the number of full-time employees, employed by the qualified taxpayer in this state, but outside of designated census tracts or economic development areas.

(C) This paragraph does not apply to a small business.

(5) The credit allowed by this section may be claimed only on a timely filed original return of the qualified taxpayer and only with respect to a qualified full-time employee for whom the qualified taxpayer has received a tentative credit reservation.

(b) For purposes
 of this section:

(1) The “tentative credit amount” for a taxable year shall be equal to the product of the applicable credit percentage for each qualified full-time employee and the qualified wages paid by the qualified taxpayer during the taxable year to that qualified full-time employee.

(2) The “applicable percentage” for a taxable year shall be equal to a fraction, the numerator of which is the net increase in the total number of full-time employees employed in this state during the taxable year, determined on an annual full-time equivalent basis, as compared with the total number of full-time employees employed in this state during the base year, determined on the same basis, and the denominator of which shall be the total number of qualified full-time employees employed in this state during the taxable year. The applicable percentage shall not exceed 100 percent.

(3) The “applicable credit percentage” means the credit percentage for the calendar year during which a qualified full-time employee was first employed by the qualified taxpayer. The applicable credit percentage for all calendar years shall be 35 percent.

(4) “Base year” means the 2013 taxable year, except in the case of a qualified taxpayer who first hires a qualified full-time employee in a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2015, the base year means the taxable year immediately preceding the taxable year in which a qualified full-time employee was first hired by the qualified taxpayer.

(5) “Acquired” includes any gift, inheritance, transfer incident to divorce, or any other transfer, whether or not for consideration.

(6) “Annual full-time
 equivalent” means either of the following:

(A) In the case of a full-time employee paid hourly qualified wages, “annual full-time equivalent” means the total number of hours worked for the qualified taxpayer by the employee, not to exceed 2,000 hours per employee, divided by 2,000.

(B) In the case of a salaried full-time employee, “annual full-time equivalent” means the total number of weeks worked for the qualified taxpayer by the employee divided by 52.

(7) “Designated census tract” means a census tract within the state that is determined by the Department of Finance to have a civilian unemployment rate that is within the top 25 percent of all census tracts within the state and has a poverty rate within the top 25 percent of all census tracts within the state, as prescribed in Section 13073.5 of the Government
 Code.

(8) “Economic development area” means either of the following:

(A) A former enterprise zone. For purposes of this section, “former enterprise zone” means an enterprise zone designated and in effect as of December 31, 2011, any enterprise zone designated during 2012, and any revision of an enterprise zone prior to June 30, 2013, under former Chapter 12.8 (commencing with Section 7070) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, as in effect on December 31, 2012, excluding any census tract within an enterprise zone that is identified by the Department of Finance pursuant to Section 13073.5 of the Government Code as a census tract within the lowest quartile of census tracts with the lowest civilian unemployment and poverty.

(B) A local agency military base recovery area designated as of the effective date of
 the act adding this subparagraph, in accordance with Section 7114 of the Government Code.

(9) “Electric airplane manufacturing” means manufacturing of electric airplanes that would be classified under Code 3364 of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 2022 edition.

(10) “Lithium production” means lithium mining and manufacturing described in Codes 212390 or 325180 of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 2022 edition.

(11) “Manufacturing of lithium batteries” means the manufacturing described in Code 335910 of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 2022 edition.

(12) “Minimum wage” means the wage established pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1171) of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(13) (A) “Qualified full-time employee” means an individual who meets all of the following requirements:

(i) (I) Performs at least 50 percent of their services for the qualified taxpayer during the taxable year in a designated census tract or economic development area.

(II) This clause does not apply to employees of a qualified taxpayer described in clause (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (14).

(ii) Receives starting wages that are at least 150 percent of the minimum wage or at least
 100 percent of the minimum wage for employees of a qualified taxpayer described in clause (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (14).

(iii) Is hired by the qualified taxpayer on or after January 1, 2014.

(iv) Is hired by the qualified taxpayer after the date the Department of Finance determines that the census tract referred to in clause (i) is a designated census tract or that the census tracts within a former enterprise zone are not census tracts with the lowest civilian unemployment and poverty.

(v) Satisfies either of the following conditions:

(I) Is paid qualified wages by the qualified taxpayer for services not less than an average of 35 hours per week.

(II) Is a
 salaried employee and was paid compensation during the taxable year for full-time employment, within the meaning of Section 515 of the Labor Code, by the qualified taxpayer.

(vi) Upon commencement of employment with the qualified taxpayer, satisfies any of the following conditions:

(I) Was unemployed for the six months immediately preceding employment with the qualified taxpayer. In the case of an individual that completed a program of study at a college, university, or other postsecondary educational institution, received a baccalaureate, postgraduate, or professional degree, and was unemployed for the six months immediately preceding employment with the qualified taxpayer, that individual must have completed that program of study at least 12 months prior to the individual’s commencement of employment with the qualified taxpayer.

(II) Is a veteran who separated from service in the Armed Forces of the United States within the 12 months preceding commencement of employment with the qualified taxpayer.

(III) Was a recipient of the credit allowed under Section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to earned income, as applicable for federal purposes, for the previous taxable year.

(IV) Is an ex-offender previously convicted of a felony.

(V) Is a recipient of either CalWORKs, in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 11250) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or general assistance, in accordance with Section 17000.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(B) An individual
 may be considered a qualified full-time employee only for the period of time commencing with the date the individual is first employed by the qualified taxpayer and ending 60 months thereafter.

(14) (A) “Qualified taxpayer” means any of the following:

(i) A person or entity engaged in a trade or business within a designated census tract or economic development area that, during the taxable year, pays or incurs qualified wages.

(ii) A person or entity engaged in semiconductor manufacturing or semiconductor research and development that, upon requesting a tentative credit reservation, self-certifies and provides verification, in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, that they intend to apply or have applied for federal funding pursuant to Sections 101 to 106, inclusive, of, or
 intend to claim or have claimed the credit pursuant to Section 107 of, Division A of the federal Creating Helpful Incentives to Produce Semiconductors (CHIPS) Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-167), and that pays or incurs qualified wages during the taxable year.

(iii) A person or entity engaged in electric airplane manufacturing that, upon requesting a tentative credit reservation, self-certifies and provides verification, in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, that they have received a sales and use tax exclusion pursuant to Section 6010.8 for an electric vertical takeoff and landing (eVTOL) manufacturer and that pays or incurs qualified wages during the taxable year.

(iv) A person or entity engaged in lithium production that, upon requesting a tentative credit reservation, self-certifies and provides verification, in the form and manner prescribed by the
 Franchise Tax Board, that they are a producer, as defined by Section 47002, who pays the tax imposed by Part 25 (commencing with Section 47000) for the taxable year and that pays or incurs qualified wages during the taxable year.

(v) (I) A person or entity engaged in manufacturing of lithium batteries that, upon requesting a tentative credit reservation, self-certifies and provides verification, in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, that their primary business is lithium battery manufacturing and that pays or incurs qualified wages during the taxable year.

(II) For purposes of this clause, “primary business” means 50 percent or more of their gross income is derived from lithium battery manufacturing.

(B) In the case of any pass-thru entity, the determination of whether a
 taxpayer is a qualified taxpayer under this section shall be made at the entity level and any credit under this section or Section 23626 shall be allowed to the pass-thru entity and passed through to the partners and shareholders in accordance with applicable provisions of this part or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001). For purposes of this subdivision, the term “pass-thru entity” means any partnership or “S” corporation.

(C) “Qualified taxpayers” shall not include any of the following:

(i) Employers that provide temporary help services, as described in Code 561320 of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 2012 edition.

(ii) Employers that provide retail trade services, as described in Sector 44-45 of the North American Industry
 Classification System (NAICS) published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 2012 edition.

(iii) Employers that are primarily engaged in providing food services, as described in Code 711110, 722511, 722513, 722514, or 722515 of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 2012 edition.

(iv) Employers that are primarily engaged in services as described in Code 713210, 721120, or 722410 of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 2012 edition.

(v) (I) An employer that is a sexually oriented business.

(II) For purposes of this clause:

(ia) “Sexually oriented business” means a nightclub, bar, restaurant, or similar commercial enterprise that provides for an audience of two or more individuals live nude entertainment or live nude performances where the nudity is a function of everyday business operations and where nudity is a planned and intentional part of the entertainment or performance.

(ib) “Nude” means clothed in a manner that leaves uncovered or visible, through less than fully opaque clothing, any portion of the genitals or, in the case of a female, any portion of the breasts below the top of the areola of the breasts.

(D) Subparagraph (C) shall not apply to a taxpayer that is a “small business.”

(15) “Qualified wages” means those wages subject to withholding pursuant to Division
 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code that meet all of the following requirements:

(A) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii) or (iii), that portion of wages paid or incurred by the qualified taxpayer during the taxable year to each qualified full-time employee that exceeds 150 percent of minimum wage, but does not exceed 350 percent of minimum wage.

(ii) (I) In the case of a qualified full-time employee employed in a designated pilot area, that portion of wages paid or incurred by the qualified taxpayer during the taxable year to each qualified full-time employee that exceeds ten dollars ($10) per hour or an equivalent amount for salaried employees, but does not exceed 350 percent of minimum wage. For qualified full-time employees described in the preceding sentence, clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of
 paragraph (13) is modified by substituting “ten dollars ($10) per hour or an equivalent amount for salaried employees” for “150 percent of the minimum wage.”

(II) For purposes of this clause:

(ia) “Designated pilot area” means an area designated as a designated pilot area by the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development.

(ib) Areas that may be designated as a designated pilot area are limited to areas within a designated census tract or an economic development area with average wages less than the statewide average wages, based on information from the Labor Market Division of the Employment Development Department, and areas within a designated census tract or an economic development area based on high poverty or high unemployment.

(ic) The
 total number of designated pilot areas that may be designated is limited to five, one or more of which must be an area within five or fewer designated census tracts within a single county based on high poverty or high unemployment or an area within an economic development area based on high poverty or high unemployment.

(id) The designation of a designated pilot area shall be applicable for a period of four calendar years, commencing with the first calendar year for which the designation of a designated pilot area is effective. The applicable period of a designated pilot area may be extended, in the sole discretion of the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, for an additional period of up to three calendar years. The applicable period, and any extended period, shall not extend beyond December 31, 2020.

(III) The designation of an area as a designated pilot area
 and the extension of the applicable period of a designated pilot area shall be at the sole discretion of the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development and shall not be subject to administrative appeal or judicial review.

(iii) For qualified full-time employees of a qualified taxpayer described in clause (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (14), that portion of wages paid or incurred by the qualified taxpayer during the taxable year to each qualified full-time employee that exceeds 100 percent of the minimum wage, but does not exceed 350 percent of the minimum wage.

(B) Wages paid or incurred during the 60-month period beginning with the first day the qualified full-time employee commences employment with the qualified taxpayer. In the case of any employee who is reemployed, including a regularly occurring seasonal increase, in the trade or
 business operations of the qualified taxpayer, this reemployment shall not be treated as constituting commencement of employment for purposes of this section.

(C) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (n), qualified wages shall not include any wages paid or incurred by the qualified taxpayer on or after the date that the Department of Finance’s redesignation of designated census tracts is effective, as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), so that a census tract is no longer a designated census tract.

(16) “Seasonal employment” means employment by a qualified taxpayer that has regular and predictable substantial reductions in trade or business operations.

(17) “Semiconductor manufacturing or semiconductor research and development” means manufacturing described in Code 3344 of the North American
 Industry Classification System (NAICS) published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 2022 edition.

(18) (A) “Small business” means a trade or business that has aggregate gross receipts, less returns and allowances reportable to this state, of less than two million dollars ($2,000,000) during the previous taxable year.

(B) (i) For purposes of this paragraph, “gross receipts, less returns and allowances reportable to this state,” means the sum of the gross receipts from the production of business income, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 25120, and the gross receipts from the production of nonbusiness income, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 25120.

(ii) In the case of any trade or business activity conducted by a partnership or an “S”
 corporation, the limitations set forth in subparagraph (A) shall be applied to the partnership or “S” corporation and to each partner or shareholder.

(C) (i) “Small business” shall not include a sexually oriented business.

(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph:

(I) “Sexually oriented business” means a nightclub, bar, restaurant, or similar commercial enterprise that provides for an audience of two or more individuals live nude entertainment or live nude performances where the nudity is a function of everyday business operations and where nudity is a planned and intentional part of the entertainment or performance.

(II) “Nude” means clothed in a manner that leaves uncovered or visible, through less than fully opaque clothing, any
 portion of the genitals or, in the case of a female, any portion of the breasts below the top of the areola of the breasts.

(19) An individual is “unemployed” for any period for which the individual is all of the following:

(A) Not in receipt of wages subject to withholding under Section 13020 of the Unemployment Insurance Code for that period.

(B) Not a self-employed individual (within the meaning of Section 401(c)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to self-employed individual) for that period.

(C) Not a registered full-time student at a high school, college, university, or other postsecondary educational institution for that period.

(c) The net increase in full-time employees
 of a qualified taxpayer shall be determined as provided by this subdivision:

(1) (A) The net increase in full-time employees shall be determined on an annual full-time equivalent basis by subtracting from the amount determined in subparagraph (C) the amount determined in subparagraph (B).

(B) The total number of full-time employees employed in the base year by the taxpayer and by any trade or business acquired by the taxpayer during the current taxable year.

(C) The total number of full-time employees employed in the current taxable year by the taxpayer and by any trade or business acquired during the current taxable year.

(2) For taxpayers who first commence doing business in this state during the taxable year, the number of
 full-time employees for the base year shall be zero.

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) All employees of the trades or businesses that are treated as related under Section 267, 318, or 707 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be treated as employed by a single taxpayer.

(2) In determining whether the taxpayer has first commenced doing business in this state during the taxable year, the provisions of subdivision (f) of Section 17276, without application of paragraph (7) of that subdivision, shall apply.

(e) (1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), to be eligible for the credit allowed by this section, a qualified taxpayer shall, upon hiring a qualified full-time employee, request a tentative credit
 reservation from the Franchise Tax Board within 30 days of complying with the Employment Development Department’s new hire reporting requirements as provided in Section 1088.5 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(B) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, and before January 1, 2024, to be eligible for the credit allowed by this section, a qualified taxpayer described in clause (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (14) of subdivision (b) shall, upon hiring a qualified full-time employee, request a tentative credit reservation from the Franchise Tax Board on or before the last day of the month following the close of the taxable year for which the credit is claimed, in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) To obtain a tentative credit reservation with respect
 to a qualified full-time employee, the qualified taxpayer shall provide necessary information, as determined by the Franchise Tax Board, including the name, social security number, the start date of employment, the rate of pay of the qualified full-time employee, the qualified taxpayer’s gross receipts, less returns and allowances, for the previous taxable year, and whether the qualified full-time employee is a resident of a targeted employment area, as defined in former Section 7072 of the Government Code, as in effect on December 31, 2013.

(3) The qualified taxpayer shall provide the Franchise Tax Board an annual certification of employment with respect to each qualified full-time employee hired in a previous taxable year, on or before, the 15th day of the third month of the taxable year. The certification shall include necessary information, as determined by the Franchise Tax Board, including the name, social security number, start date of
 employment, and rate of pay for each qualified full-time employee employed by the qualified taxpayer.

(4) (A) A qualified taxpayer, as defined under clause (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (14) of subdivision (b), shall, upon request, provide to the Franchise Tax Board the applicable verification specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (14) of subdivision (b).

(B) The verification shall be provided in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.
